Hawaii statutes.
[PART VI.
GENERAL PROVISIONS]

[§92-71] Political subdivision of the
State; applicability. The provisions contained in this chapter shall apply
to all political subdivisions of the State. Provided, however, in the event
that any political subdivision of the State shall provide by charter, ordinance
or otherwise, more stringent requirements relating to mandating the openness of
meetings, the more stringent provisions of said charter, ordinance, or
otherwise, shall apply. [L 1976, c 212, §5]

Attorney General Opinions

Interpretation of "board" as excluding county
council would be inconsistent with this section. Att. Gen. Op. 86-5.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next